Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1201.07
Department; divisions and program;
advisory committees and programs; authorized.

The department
may have the divisions and program listed in this section to aid in the discharge
of its duties but shall not be limited to such divisions and program: (1)
An Existing Business Assistance Division; (2) a Business Recruitment Division;
(3) a Community and Rural Development Division; and (4) a Community Development Block Grant Program.
Each division and program, when deemed appropriate by the director, is encouraged
to establish advisory committees and programs to insure public participation
and input.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 190, § 7;

Laws 1998, LB 1053, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 27.
July 1, 2012